Washington statutes.
RCW 19.25.800

Chapter not applicable to broadcast by commercial or educational radio or television.

This chapter shall not be applicable to any recording that is used or intended to be used only for broadcast by commercial or educational radio or television stations.

[ 1991 c 38 s 6.]